Louisiana, session 2026, SB446.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 56:325.7 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§325.7. Commercial menhaden fishery buffers
A. The menhaden season shall apply to all waters one-half statute mile
seaward of the inside-outside line described in R.S. 56:495, except as provided
in Subsection B of this Section, including waters in the Federal Exclusive
Economic Zone (EEZ), and in Chandeleur and Breton Sounds as described in
Subsection C of this Section. All other inside waters and passes are permanently
closed to menhaden fishing.
B. The menhaden season shall apply to the following waters:
(1) Beginning one statute mile seaward of the inside-outside line from the
eastern shore of Belle Pass, Louisiana to the eastern shore of Caminada Pass,
Louisiana.
(2) Beginning three statute miles seaward of the inside-outside line from
Page 1 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-682 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 446
the eastern shore of Caminada Pass, Louisiana to the eastern shore of Barataria
Pass, Louisiana.
(3) Beginning one statute mile seaward of the inside-outside line from the
eastern shore of Barataria Pass, Louisiana to the eastern shore of Pass Abel,
Louisiana.
(4) Beginning one statute mile seaward of the inside-outside line from the
intersection of a private levee road and LA-27, at latitude 29 degrees 46 minutes
01.54 seconds N, longitude 93 degrees 24 minutes 23.00 seconds W, thence
westward to the easternmost point of the rock breakwaters west of Holly Beach,
Louisiana, at latitude 29 degrees 46 minutes 00.90 seconds N, longitude 93
degrees 29 minutes 26.91 seconds W. All coordinates are in NAD 1983 feet.
C. For purposes of the menhaden season, Breton and Chandeleur Sounds
are described as that portion of the statutorily described inside waters as shown
on a map by Raymond C. Impastato, P.L.S., dated July 20, 1992, and more
particularly described as follows: beginning at the most northerly point on the
south side of Taylor Pass, latitude 29 degrees 23 minutes 00 seconds N, longitude
89 degrees 20 minutes 06 seconds W, which is on the inside-outside shrimp line
as described in R.S. 56:495; thence westerly to Deep Water Point, latitude 29
degrees 23 minutes 36 seconds N, longitude 89 degrees 22 minutes 54 seconds
W; thence westerly to Coquille Point, latitude 29 degrees 23 minutes 36 seconds
N, longitude 89 degrees 24 minutes 12 seconds W; thence westerly to Raccoon
Point, latitude 29 degrees 24 minutes 06 seconds N, longitude 89 degrees 28
minutes 10 seconds W; thence northerly to the most northerly point of Sable
Island, latitude 29 degrees 24 minutes 54 seconds N, longitude 89 degrees 28
minutes 27 seconds W; thence northwesterly to California Point, latitude 29
degrees 27 minutes 33 seconds N, longitude 89 degrees 31 minutes 18 seconds
W; thence northerly to Telegraph Point, latitude 29 degrees 30 minutes 57
seconds N, longitude 89 degrees 30 minutes 57 seconds W; thence northerly to
Mozambique Point, latitude 29 degrees 37 minutes 20 seconds N, longitude 89
Page 2 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-682 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 446
degrees 29 minutes 11 seconds W; thence northeasterly to Grace Point, at red
light no. 62 on the Mississippi River-Gulf Outlet Canal, latitude 29 degrees 40
minutes 40 seconds N, longitude 89 degrees 23 minutes 10 seconds W; thence
northerly to Deadman Point, latitude 29 degrees 44 minutes 06 seconds N,
longitude 89 degrees 21 minutes 05 seconds W; thence easterly to Point Lydia,
latitude 29 degrees 45 minutes 27 seconds N, longitude 89 degrees 16 minutes
12 seconds W; thence northerly to Point Comfort, latitude 29 degrees 49
minutes 32 seconds N, longitude 89 degrees 14 minutes 18 seconds W; thence
northerly to the most easterly point on Mitchell Island, latitude 29 degrees 53
minutes 42 seconds N, longitude 89 degrees 11 minutes 50 seconds W; thence
northerly to the most easterly point on Martin Island, latitude 29 degrees 57
minutes 30 seconds N, longitude 89 degrees 11 minutes 05 seconds W; thence
northerly to the most easterly point on Brush Island, latitude 30 degrees 02
minutes 42 seconds N, longitude 89 degrees 10 minutes 06 seconds W; thence
northerly to Door Point, latitude 30 degrees 03 minutes 45 seconds N, longitude
89 degrees 10 minutes 08 seconds W; thence northerly to the most easterly point
on Isle Au Pitre, latitude 30 degrees 09 minutes 27 seconds N, longitude 89
degrees 11 minutes 02 seconds W; thence grid north a distance of 19214.60 feet
to a point on the Louisiana-Mississippi Lateral Boundary, latitude 30 degrees
12 minutes 37.1781 seconds N, longitude 89 degrees 10 minutes 57.8925 seconds
W; thence S60 degrees 20 minutes 06 seconds grid east along the
Louisiana-Mississippi Lateral Boundary a distance of 31555.38 feet, latitude 30
degrees 09 minutes 57.4068 seconds N, longitude 89 degrees 05 minutes 48.9240
seconds W; thence S82 degrees 53 minutes 53 seconds grid east continuing along
the Louisiana-Mississippi Lateral Boundary a distance of 72649.38 feet, latitude
30 degrees 08 minutes 14.1260 seconds N, longitude 89 degrees 52 minutes
10.3224 seconds W; thence grid south a distance of 32521.58 feet to the
Chandeleur Light, latitude 30 degrees 02 minutes 52 seconds N, longitude 88
degrees 52 minutes 18 seconds W, which is on the inside-outside shrimp line as
Page 3 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-682 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 446
described in R.S. 56:495; thence southeasterly along the inside-outside shrimp
line as described in R.S. 56:495 to the point of beginning.
D. The commission shall promulgate no rule or regulation for the
purpose, in whole or in part, of modifying the commercial menhaden fishery
coastal buffer restrictions set forth in this Section before August 1, 2028.